District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-314

Office of Financial Management established

Repealed.

History

April 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 97, Pub. L. 104-8, § 302(c)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 47-314 to 47-317.

Mayor's Orders

Deputy Mayor for Office of Financial Management established: See Mayor’s Order 83-19, January 3, 1983.

Establishment of Office of District of Columbia Controller: See Mayor’s Order 89-243, October 23, 1989.

Establishment of Office of Treasurer: See Mayor’s Order 89-244, October 23, 1989.

Establishment of Office of Financial Information Services: See Mayor’s Order 89-245, October 23, 1989.

Editor's Notes

Repeal of §§ 47-314 through 47-317: Section 302(c) of Pub. L. 104-8, 109 Stat. 148, April 17, 1995, provided that effective upon the appointment of the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia under § 1-204.24a, D.C. Law 3-138 which enacted §§ 47-314 through 47-317 are repealed. Upon the appointment of a Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia pursuant to Mayor’s Order 95-124, effective October 27, 1995, §§ 47-314 through 47-317 were repealed.